th: เฟอร์นิเจอร์ > อุปกรณ์โซฟา: ที่หนุนเก้าอี้และโซฟา; โซฟาเข้ามุม; ขาโซฟา
lt-LT: Baldai > Sofų priedai: Kėdžių ir sofų atramos; Sekcijiniai sofų blokai; Sofos kojos
hu: Bútor > Kanapékiegészítők: Szék- és kanapétámaszok; Szekcionált kanapéegységek; Kanapélábak
nl: Meubelen > Accessoires voor sofa's: Ondersteuning voor stoelen en sofa's; Zitbankelementen; Bankpoten
sl-SI: Pohištvo > Dodatki za sedežne garniture: Nosilci za stole in sedežne garniture; Modularne sedežne garniture; Noge za kavče
fi: Huonekalut > Sohvatarvikkeet: Tuoli- ja sohvatuet; Sohvamoduulit; Sohvanjalat
de: Möbel > Sofa-Zubehör: Sitzverstärkung für Stühle & Sofas; Anbausofas; Sofafüße
ko: 가구 > 소파 부대용품: 의자/소파 받침대; 분리형 개별 소파 유닛; 소파 다리
hr-HR: Namještaj > Dodaci za sofe: Potpornji za stolice i sofe; Elementi za kutne garniture; Noge za sofu
vi: Đồ gỗ > Phụ kiện ghế sofa: Nệm lót ghế và ghế sofa; Các bộ phận ghế sofa; Chân ghế sofa
pt-PT: Mobiliário > Acessórios de sofá: Suportes de cadeira e sofá; Unidades de sofá de secções; Pernas para sofás
da: Møbler > Tilbehør til sofaer: Sædeunderlag til stole og sofaer; Sofasektioner; Sofaben
en: Furniture > Sofa Accessories: Chair & Sofa Supports; Sectional Sofa Units; Sofa Legs
fr: Meubles > Accessoires pour canapés: Supports pour fauteuils et canapés; Éléments pour canapés modulables; Pieds de canapé
ro-RO: Mobilier > Accesorii pentru canapele: Suporturi pentru scaune și canapele; Unități canapele modulare; Picioare pentru canapea
pl: Meble > Akcesoria do sof: Podpórki pod sofy i krzesła; Segmenty wersalek; Nogi do kanap
zh-TW: 家具 > 沙發配件: 椅子和沙發輔具; 沙發組件; 沙發椅腳
cs: Nábytek > Příslušenství k pohovkám: Nosné plochy křesel a pohovek; Části rohových sedaček; Nohy k pohovkám
it: Arredamento > Accessori per divani: Supporti per sedie e divani; Moduli sezioni per divano; Gambe per divani
sk-SK: Nábytok > Príslušenstvo k pohovkám: Podpery na stoličky a pohovky; Sedacie súpravy; Nohy pohovky
bg-BG: Мебели > Аксесоари за дивани: Подпори за столове и дивани; Секции на дивани; Крака за диван
ru: Мебель > Аксессуары для диванов: Поддерживающие подкладки для кресел и диванов; Модули секционных диванов; Ножки для диванов
el: Έπιπλα > Αξεσουάρ καναπέ: Στήριγμα καρέκλας & καναπέ; Μονάδες καναπέδων σε κομμάτια; Πόδια καναπέ
ja: 家具 > ソファ関連用品: 椅子・ソファ用支持材; 組み合わせ式ソファー ユニット; ソファの脚
tr: Mobilyalar > Kanepe Aksesuarları: Koltuk ve Kanepe Destekleri; Ayrılabilir Koltuk Birimleri; Kanepe ayakları
nb: Møbler > Sofatilbehør: Stol- og sofastøtter; Sofaseksjonsenheter; Sofabein
pt-BR: Móveis > Acessórios para sofá: Suportes para sofás e poltronas; Unidades de sofás modulares; Pés para sofá
sv: Möbler > Sofftillbehör: Stol- och soffstöd; Soffsektioner; Soffben
zh-CN: 家具 > 沙发配件: 椅子/沙发支撑垫; 组合沙发单元; 沙发腿
es: Mobiliario > Accesorios para sofás: Soportes para sillas y sofás; Unidades para sofás seccionales; Patas para sofá